Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 64. School Health Services Committee.

History.

2022, cc. 707, 749.

§ 30-409.
(Expires July 1, 2025) School Health Services Committee; purpose.

The School Health Services Committee (the Committee) is established in the legislative branch of state government. The purpose of the Committee is to review and provide advice to the General Assembly and other policy makers regarding proposals that require local school boards to offer certain health services in a school setting. The Committee shall submit its findings and recommendations to the General Assembly and the Governor by October 1 of each year.

History.

2022, cc. 707, 749.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, cc. 707 and
749, cl. 2 provides: “That, for its first year of existence, if the School Health Services Committee (the Committee) is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act, the Committee may be funded from the operating budgets of the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates upon the approval of the Joint Rules Committee. If the Committee is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act for any year thereafter, this chapter shall expire on July 1 of the fiscal year in which the Committee fails to receive such funding.”

§ 30-410.
(Expires July 1, 2025) Membership; terms; quorum; meetings.

The Committee shall have a total membership of 15 members that shall consist of 8 legislative members, five nonlegislative citizen members, and two ex officio members. Members shall be appointed as follows: three members of the Senate, each of whom shall be a member of the Senate Committee on Education and Health, to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; five members of the House of Delegates, each of whom shall be a member of either the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions or a member of the House Committee on Education, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates; three nonlegislative citizen members, one of whom shall be an educator at a public school in the Commonwealth, one of whom shall be a school nurse at a public school in the Commonwealth, and one of whom shall be a public health expert, to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; and two nonlegislative citizen members, one of whom shall be an educator at a public school in the Commonwealth and one of whom shall be a public health expert, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates. The Superintendent of Public Instruction and the State Health Commissioner, or their designees, shall serve ex officio with nonvoting privileges. Nonlegislative citizen members of the Committee shall be citizens of the Commonwealth. Unless otherwise approved in writing by the chairman of the Committee and the respective Clerk, nonlegislative citizen members shall only be reimbursed for travel originating and ending within the Commonwealth for the purpose of attending meetings.

Legislative members and ex officio members of the Committee shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office.

Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. All members may be reappointed.

Nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed for a term of two years.

The Committee shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership, who shall be members of the General Assembly.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Committee shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

No recommendation of the Committee shall be adopted if a majority of the Senate members or a majority of the House members appointed to the Committee (i) vote against the recommendation and (ii) vote for the recommendation to fail notwithstanding the majority vote of the Committee.

History.

2022, cc. 707, 749.

§ 30-411.
(Expires July 1, 2025) Compensation; expenses; annual report.

Legislative members of the Committee shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12, and nonlegislative citizen members shall receive such compensation for the performance of their duties as provided in §

2.2-2813

. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Compensation to members of the General Assembly for attendance at official meetings of the Committee shall be paid by the offices of the Clerk of the House of Delegates or Clerk of the Senate, as applicable. All other compensation and expenses shall be paid from existing appropriations to the Committee or, if unfunded, shall be approved by the Joint Rules Committee.

The Committee shall submit to the General Assembly and the Governor an annual report for publication as a report document as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports. The chairman of the Committee shall submit to the General Assembly and the Governor an annual executive summary of the interim activity and work of the Committee no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted for publication as a report document as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

2022, cc. 707, 749.

§ 30-412.
(Expires July 1, 2025) Staffing.

Administrative staff support shall be provided by the Office of the Clerk of the Senate or the Office of the Clerk of the House of Delegates as may be appropriate for the house in which the chairman of the Committee serves. The Division of Legislative Services shall provide legal, research, policy analysis, and other services as requested by the Committee.

History.

2022, cc. 707, 749.

§ 30-413.
(Expires July 1, 2025) Sunset.

This chapter shall expire on July 1, 2025.

History.

2022, cc. 707, 749.